cs: Materiál koncovky na prut: Hliník; Kompozitní; Korek; Ethylen vinylacetát (EVA); Hypalon; Plast; Guma; Dřevo; Jiné
zh-CN: 尾盖材质: 铝; 复合材料; 软木; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯 (EVA); 氯磺化聚乙烯; 塑料; 橡胶; 木头; 其他
pt-PT: Material da capa de extremidade: Alumínio; Composto; Cortiça; Etileno acetato de vinilo (EVA); Hypalon; Plástico; Borracha; Madeira; Outro
en: Butt cap material: Aluminum; Composite; Cork; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Hypalon; Plastic; Rubber; Wood; Other
tr: Uç kapağı malzemesi: Alüminyum; Kompozit; Mantar; Etilen vinil asetat (EVA); Hipalon; Plastik; Kauçuk; Ahşap; Diğer
ko: 엉덩이 캡 소재: 알루미늄; 복합물; 코르크; 에틸렌 비닐 아세테이트(EVA); 하이팔론; 플라스틱; 고무; 목재; 기타
ru: Материал заглушки: Алюминий; Композит; Пробка; Этиленвинилацетат (ЭВА); Хайпалон; Пластик; Резина; Дерево; Другое
nb: Bakhettemateriale: Aluminium; Kompositt; Kork; Etylenvinylacetat (EVA); Hypalon; Plast; Gummi; Trevirke; Annet
es: Material de la tapa del extremo trasero: Aluminio; Compuesto; Corcho; Acetato de etileno y vinilo (EVA); Hipalon; Plástico; Goma; Madera; Otros
el: Υλικό καπακιού της λαβής: Αλουμίνιο; Σύνθετο υλικό; Φελλός; Πολυμερές αιθυλενίου και οξικού βινυλίου (EVA); Hypalon; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Ξύλο; Άλλο
vi: Chất liệu bọc cần câu cá: Nhôm; Tổng hợp; Thảm gỗ bần; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Hypalon; Nhựa; Cao su; Gỗ; Khác
sv: Material på bakstycke: Aluminium; Sammansatt; Kork; Etenvinylacetat (EVA); Hypalon; Plast; Gummi; Trä; Övrigt
lt-LT: Antgalio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Kompozitas; Kamštis; Etileno vinilo acetatas (EVA); Hipalonas; Plastikas; Kaučiukas; Mediena; Kita
pl: Materiał nasadki: Aluminium; Kompozyt; Korek; Polietylen-co-oktan winylu (EVA); Hypalon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Guma; Drewno; Inne
da: Butt cap-materiale: Aluminum; Komposit; Kork; Ethylen-vinylacetat (EVA); Hypalon; Plast; Gummi; Træ; Andet
sl-SI: Material zaključka ročaja palice: Aluminij; Kompozit; Pluta; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Hypalon; Plastika; Guma; Les; Drugo
th: วัสดุสำหรับฝาครอบปุ่ม: อะลูมิเนียม; วัสดุคอมโพสิต; ต้นคอร์ก; อีทิลีนไวนิลอะซิเตต (EVA); ไฮพาลอน; พลาสติก; ยาง; ไม้; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Material do gimbal: Alumínio; Composto; Cortiça; Etileno acetato de vinila (EVA); Hipalon; Plástico; Borracha; Madeira; Outro
fi: Perän suojuksen materiaali: Alumiini; Komposiitti; Korkki; Eteenivinyyliasetaatti (EVA); Hypalon; Muovi; Kumi; Puu; Muu
hr-HR: Materijal kapice za dršku: Aluminij; Kompozit; Pluto; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Hypalon; Plastika; Guma; Drvo; Ostalo
fr: Matériau du capuchon: Aluminum; Composite; Liège; Éthylène-acétate de vinyle (EVA); Hypalon; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Bois; Autre
it: Materiale del tappo: Alluminio; Composito; Sughero; Etilene acetato di vinile (EVA); Hypalon; Plastica; Gomma; Legno; Altro
zh-TW: 托套材質: 鋁; 複合; 軟木; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯共聚物; 海巴龍; 塑膠; 橡膠; 木材; 其他
nl: Hengeldopmateriaal: Aluminium; Composiet; Kurk; Ethyleen-vinylacetaat (EVA); Hypalon; Plastic; Rubber; Hout; Andere
de: Griffkappenmaterial: Aluminium; Zusammengesetzt; Kork; Ethylen-Vinylacetat (EVA); Hypalon; Kunststoff; Gummi; Holz; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Материал на капачката на водача: Алуминий; Композит; Корк; Етиленвинилацетат (EVA); Хипалон; Пластмаса; Каучук; Дърво; Други
hu: Védősapka anyaga: Alumínium; Kompozit; Parafa; Etilén-vinil-acetát (EVA); Hypalon; Műanyag; Gumi; Fa; Egyéb
sk-SK: Materiál päty rukoväte: Hliník; Kompozit; Korok; Etylénvinylacetát (EVA); Hypalón; Plast; Guma; Drevo; Iné
ro-RO: Material capac capăt: Aluminiu; Compozit; Plută; Etilen acetat de vinil (EVA); Hypalon; Plastic; Cauciuc; Lemn; Altele
ja: バットキャップの素材: アルミニウム; 複合; コルク; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテート (EVA); ハイパロン; プラスチック; ゴム; 木材; その他